Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 1. Organization and Preliminary Report of Commissioners

§ 41-9-101.
Petition for organization; when filed; contents; service of notice or petitions generally.

Whenever a majority of the adult owners of lands within any district of land, who shall represent one-third in area of the lands within said district to be reclaimed or benefited, or whenever the adult owners of more than one-half of the lands within such district desire to construct one (1) or more drains, ditches, levees, or other works across the lands of others, for the promotion of the public health or welfare, and the drainage of said lands, or desire to maintain and keep in repair any such drain, ditch or levee heretofore constructed under any law of this state, such owners may file in the district court of any county in which the lands, or any part of them, shall lie, a petition setting forth:

The proposed names of said drainage district;

The necessity of the proposed work, describing the necessity;

A general description of the proposed starting points, routes and termini of the proposed drains, ditches, and levees;

A general description of the lands proposed to be included in said district;

The names of the owners of all lands in said district when known.

If the purpose of said petitioners is the enlargement, repair and maintenance of a ditch, levee or other work heretofore constructed under any law of this state, said petition shall give a general description of the same, with such particulars as may be deemed important.

Said petition shall pray for the organization of a drainage district by the name and within the boundaries proposed, and for the appointment of commissioners for the execution of such proposed work, according to the provisions of this and the following sections.

Any lands, the title to which is in the state of Wyoming, and which are within the boundaries of any drainage district heretofore created, or which may be hereafter created, may be included in any such drainage district in the same manner as is by law provided for adding other lands to drainage districts whenever it is found necessary to include lands in drainage districts, as by the preceding paragraphs provided.

Any and all copies of petitions, or notices, required by law to be served on account of such lands being included in such drainage districts, shall be served on the president of the board having control of such lands in the same manner as is hereinafter provided for the service of petitions and notices on other owners of lands in the district in which said lands are situated.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 1; 1915, ch. 155, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 997; R.S. 1931, § 122-801; C.S. 1945, § 71-1401; W.S. 1957, § 41-355.

Constitutionality. —

Provisions of drainage district act authorizing additional assessments proportioned on last assessment of benefits approved by court, without notice for purpose of completing construction or paying interest on lawful indebtedness, are not unconstitutional in view of other provisions of act for an adjudication upon notice after full hearing of the amount, nature, benefits and detail plans of drainage construction. In re Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 24 Wyo. 143, 156 P. 610,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1916).

Applicability of act. —

The provisions of subdivision 6 [subsection (b)] are not applicable to drainage districts created under the provisions of this article. Dickey v. Bullock, 28 Wyo. 265, 202 P. 1104,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1922).

Benefits must be determined at time of original organization. —

Organizers were obligated to make a determination of the benefits to the lands at the time of original organization. In re Big Bend Drainage Dist., 418 P.2d 784,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1966).

Omission of lands directly affected from petition. —

If organizers of a district, failing to recognize the true purpose of the law or prompted by some other motive than complying with the strict requirements of the legislation on the subject, knowingly omit from their petition certain lands directly affected, the requirements of a petition are not met; and a later attempt to bring in such lands will result in a piecemeal erection of a drainage district, and the later proceeding must fail. In re Big Bend Drainage Dist., 418 P.2d 784,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1966).

Inclusion of outside land. —

Under subdivision 6 [subsection (b)] hereof petition for inclusion of outside land in a district was not to cover “enlargement, repair, and maintenance”; and did not require allegations required in an original petition for organization. Delfelder Drainage Dist. v. Givens, 45 Wyo. 123, 16 P.2d 57,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1932).

Supplementary proceeding. —

A petition for inclusion of outside lands in a drainage district, with a general reference to the district as organized, is a supplementary proceeding after organization of the district and not an original proceeding. Delfelder Drainage Dist. v. Givens, 45 Wyo. 123, 16 P.2d 57,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1932).

Law reviews. —

For article “Tax Lien Priority,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 255 (1950).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Tax sale as freeing property from possibility of further assessments for benefits to land, 11 ALR2d 1133.

Easement, servitude or restrictive covenant as affected by enforcement of assessment or improvement liens, 26 ALR2d 873.

Liability of landowner for damages caused by overflow, seepage or the like resulting from defect in artificial underground drain, conduit or pipe, 44 ALR2d 960.

Easement by prescription in artificial drains, pipes or sewers, 55 ALR2d 1144.

Superiority of special or local assessment lien for drains over earlier private lien or mortgage, where statute creating such special lien is silent as to superiority, 75 ALR2d 1121.

Modern status of rules governing interference with drainage of surface waters, 93 ALR3d 1193.

§ 41-9-102.
Petition for organization; amendment; multiple petitions.

No petition having as many signers as are required by this section shall be declared void, but the court may at any time permit the petition to be amended in form and substance to conform to the facts, if the facts justify the organization of a drainage district. Several similar petitions for the organization of the same district may be circulated, and when filed, shall together be regarded as one (1) petition having as many signers as there are separate adult signers on the several petitions filed, who own lands within said proposed drainage district. All petitions for the organization of said district filed prior to the hearing on said petition shall be considered by the court, the same as is filed with the first petitions placed on file, and the signatures thereon contained shall be counted in determining whether sufficient landowners have signed said petition.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 998; R.S. 1931, § 122-802; C.S. 1945, § 71-1402; W.S. 1957, § 41-356.

§ 41-9-103.
What lands may be included.

Said territory need not be contiguous, provided, that it be so situated that the public health or welfare will be promoted by such drainage of each part thereof, and the benefits of the proposed work in each part will exceed the damages from and costs of said proposed work in each part; and provided, further, that the court shall be satisfied that said proposed work can be more cheaply done if in a single district than otherwise.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 999; R.S. 1931, § 122-803; C.S. 1945, § 71-1403; W.S. 1957, § 41-357.

§ 41-9-104.
Notice of hearing; service generally; contents.

On such petition being filed the court or judge thereof shall make an order fixing a time and place of hearing thereon and ordering notice; thereupon the clerk of said court, for the county in which the proceedings are instituted, shall cause twenty (20) days notice of the filing of such petition to be given:

By serving or causing to be served a copy of such notice on each owner of land within said proposed district, residing in any county in which any lands in said proposed district are situated, either personally or by leaving a copy thereof at his last usual place of abode, with a person of suitable age and discretion, and by registered mail to any mortgagee, mortgagees or judgment lienholder whose address is of record in the records of said liens in the county or counties in which said district is situated; and

By publishing a copy thereof at least once a week for three (3) successive weeks in some newspaper published in each county from which any part of the district is proposed to be taken. If there be no newspaper in any such county, such notice may be published in a newspaper published in an adjoining county.

Such notice shall state:

In what court said petition is filed;

State briefly the starting points, routes and termini of said drains, ditches and levees;

Give a general description of the proposed work;

Give the proposed boundaries of said district (or a general description of all of the lands in said proposed district);

Give the name proposed for said drainage district; and

Shall also state the time and place by the court fixed, when and where the petitioners will ask a hearing on said petition.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 1000; Laws 1929, ch. 84, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-804; C.S. 1945, § 71-1404; W.S. 1957, § 41-358.

Cross references. —

See also §

41-9-251

.

§ 41-9-105.
Notice of hearing; nonresidents.

If any of the owners of land in said district are nonresidents of the county or counties in which the proposed district lies, the petition shall be accompanied by an affidavit giving the names and post-office address of such nonresidents, if such are known, and if unknown shall state that, upon diligent inquiry their names or post-office addresses (whichever may be the fact) cannot be ascertained. The clerk of the court shall mail a copy of the notice aforesaid to each of said nonresident owners whose post-office address is known, within six (6) days after the first publication of the same.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 1001; R.S. 1931, § 122-805; C.S. 1945, § 71-1405; W.S. 1957, § 41-359.

§ 41-9-106.
Notice of hearing; proof of service.

The certificate of the clerk of the court or other public officer, or the affidavit of any other person who knows the facts, affixed to a copy of said notice, shall be sufficient evidence of the posting, serving, mailing or publication thereof.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 1002; R.S. 1931, § 122-806; C.S. 1945, § 71-1406; W.S. 1957, § 41-360.

§ 41-9-107.
Notice of hearing; effect of personal service.

Personal service of said notice on (or service by leaving at the last usual place of abode of) all owners of lands or easements or interest in lands within said district, shall give the court complete jurisdiction, without posting, publication or mailing of said notice.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 8; C.S. 1920, § 1003; R.S. 1931, § 122-807; C.S. 1945, § 71-1407; W.S. 1957, § 41-361.

§ 41-9-108.
Notice of hearing; adjournment of hearings when notice not fully served.

If it shall be found, before the hearing on a petition for the organization of a drainage district, that one (1) or more owners of land in said district have not been duly served with notice of hearing on said petition, the court, or presiding judge, shall not thereby lose jurisdiction. The court, or presiding judge, in such case shall adjourn the hearing, make an order directing the serving of said notice upon said landowner, and fixing the time and manner of service of such notice, which notice shall notify him to appear at said adjourned time and place and be heard on said petition.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 9; C.S. 1920, § 1004; R.S. 1931, § 122-808; C.S. 1945, § 71-1408; W.S. 1957, § 41-362.

Cross references. —

As to hearings, see §

41-9-111

et seq.

§ 41-9-109.
Notice of hearing; service after adjournment.

Said notice shall be served personally or by leaving at the last usual place of abode of said unserved owners, as in W.S.

41-9-104

; provided, not less than eight (8) days before said adjourned hearing, or published not less than fourteen (14) days before said adjourned hearing, in some newspaper published in the county in which said owners’ lands lie, or if no newspaper be published in said county, then in some newspaper published in an adjoining county.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 10; C.S. 1920, § 1005; R.S. 1931, § 122-809; C.S. 1945, § 71-1409; W.S. 1957, § 41-363.

Cross references. —

As to hearings generally, see §

41-9-111

et seq.

§ 41-9-110.
Notice of hearing; defective service generally.

Upon the adjourned day the same proceedings, adjournments, trial findings and orders may be had as in case of complete service of notice in the first instance. In case of failure to mail said notice as herein required, the court or judge may order the same mailed later and shall adjourn said hearing so that said notice shall be mailed at least fourteen (14) days before said adjourned hearing. In case of failure to publish or post notice, as in this act required, the court or judge may adjourn said hearing for sufficient time to permit the due posting and publication of said notice, and order said notice posted or published as in W.S.

41-9-104

hereof directed. In case of adjournment to permit notice to be given the notice shall state the fact of such adjournment and the time and place of hearing pursuant to said adjournment.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 11; C.S. 1920, § 1006; R.S. 1931, § 122-810; C.S. 1945, § 71-1410; W.S. 1957, § 41-364.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” refer to Laws 1911, ch. 95, which appears herein as §§

41-9-101

through

41-9-201

,

41-9-203

through

41-9-245

,

41-9-247

through

41-9-252

,

41-9-254

through

41-9-258

,

41-9-260

through

41-9-273

.

§ 41-9-111.
Hearings; grounds for contesting.

On the day fixed for hearing on such petition all parties owning lands, or any interest or easement in land, within said proposed district, or who would be affected thereby, may appear and contest (a) the sufficiency of the petition, (b) the sufficiency of the signers of the petition, (c) the sufficiency of the notice, (d) the constitutionality of the law, and (e) the jurisdiction of the court, specifying their objections to such jurisdiction; and the petitioners and contestants may, on the trial, offer any competent evidence in regard thereto. All notices of contest shall be in writing and shall clearly specify the grounds of contest.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 12; C.S. 1920, § 1007; R.S. 1931, § 122-811; C.S. 1945, § 71-1411; W.S. 1957, § 41-365.

Cross references. —

See also §

41-9-305

as to hearing on division of district. As to adjournment of hearing when notice not fully served, see §

41-9-108

. As to service of notice of hearing after adjournment, see §

41-9-109

.

§ 41-9-112.
Hearings; procedure generally.

The court shall hear and determine whether or not the petition contains the signatures of a majority of the adult owners of lands within the said proposed district who are of lawful age, and who represent one-third in area of the lands proposed to be affected by said work, or the signatures of the adult owners of more than one-half of such lands and shall determine all questions of law arising on said contest. The district court in which such petition shall be filed or the judge thereof may adjourn the hearing on said petition from time to time for want of sufficient notice, or to give time to prepare for trial, or for other good cause.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 13; C.S. 1920, § 1008; R.S. 1931, § 122-812; C.S. 1945, § 71-1412; W.S. 1957, § 41-366.

§ 41-9-113.
Hearings; affidavits of petitioners as evidence.

The affidavit of any three (3) or more of the signers of said petition stating that they have examined it and are acquainted with the locality of said district and that said petition is signed by a sufficient number of adult owners of lands in said district, to satisfy W.S.

41-9-101

, may be taken by the court or judge as prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated. And the affidavit of any petitioner or other landowner before such court, or represented before the court, giving the age of such affiant and his or her ownership of such lands, to be named therein by proper description, shall be sufficient evidence to the court of such facts.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 14; C.S. 1920, § 1009; R.S. 1931, § 122-813; C.S. 1945, § 71-1413; W.S. 1957, § 41-367.

§ 41-9-114.
Hearings; dismissal of defective petition.

If the court or presiding judge thereof, after hearing any and all competent evidence that may be offered for and against the said petition, shall find that the same has not been signed as herein required, the said petition shall be dismissed at the cost of the petitioners, and judgment shall be entered against said petitioners for the amount of said costs.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 16; C.S. 1920, § 1011; R.S. 1931, § 122-815; C.S. 1945, § 71-1415; W.S. 1957, § 41-368.

§ 41-9-115.
Fraudulent conveyances to defeat or establish petition.

All deeds made for the purpose of establishing or defeating the prayer of said petition, and not made in good faith and for a valuable consideration, shall be taken and held to be a fraud and the holders thereof shall not be considered as the owners of the land described therein.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 15; C.S. 1920, § 1010; R.S. 1931, § 122-814; C.S. 1945, § 71-1414; W.S. 1957, § 41-369.

§ 41-9-116.
District commissioners; number; appointment; preliminary bond; qualifications; petition for election; election decree; election procedures; modification of decree.

If it shall appear that the petition has so been signed, the court or judge shall so find, and order any necessary amendments thereto, and shall appoint three (3) suitable, competent persons as commissioners, and fix their preliminary bond. If the district is situated in two (2) or more counties, not more than two (2) of said commissioners shall reside in any one (1) of said counties. Ownership of land within the district shall not disqualify a person from acting as a commissioner. Provided, however, after the appointment of the first board of commissioners a majority of the owners of land within said district who own one-third in area of the lands within said district, shall petition the court asking that the commissioners of said district be elected by vote of the owners of land assessed in said district, the court shall make and enter an order fixing the time of the annual election for said district, prescribing the manner of giving notice of such election, and the manner in which such election shall be conducted, and may provide for cumulative voting; said order may provide for the election of one (1) commissioner for one (1) year and two (2) commissioners for two (2) years at the first election, succeeding commissioners to be elected for two (2) years; at such election every person, company or corporation owning land assessed for benefits within such district shall be entitled at such election to cast one (1) vote for each acre of land, or fraction thereof, owned by such person, company or corporation within said district and assessed for benefits therein; such order shall provide for voting by proxy, and such order may be modified from time to time upon petition as herein provided for the election of commissioners, and upon like petition such order may be revoked and thereafter such commissioners shall be appointed by the court.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 17; C.S. 1920, § 1012; Laws 1923, ch. 10, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-816; C.S. 1945, § 71-1416; W.S. 1957, § 41-370.

Cross references. —

As to water conservancy district board of directors, see §§

41-3-740

through

41-3-758

.

As to board of control generally, see §§

41-4-201

through

41-4-211

.

As to board of district managers, and as to duties of commissioners with reference thereto, in connection with irrigation and drainage districts generally, see §§

41-6-120

through

41-6-127

.

As to suspension, etc., of commissioners upon default and payment of state bonds, see §

41-6-203

.

As to appointment, etc., of special commissioners upon default and payment of bonds held by state, see §

41-6-204

et seq.

As to drainage district commissioners constituting the corporate authority of district, see §

41-9-136

.

As to personal liability of commissioners on indebtedness of districts, see §

41-9-256

.

For provision prohibiting commissioners to have financial interest in construction contracts, see §

41-9-261

.

For constitutional provisions as to irrigation and water rights generally, see Wyo. Const., art. 8, §§ 1 through 5.

Cited

in

W.S. Dickey Clay Mfg. Co. v. Bullock, 28 Wyo. 265, 202 P. 1104,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1922).

§ 41-9-117.
District commissioners; oath; bond generally; quorum.

Before entering upon their duties such commissioners shall take and subscribe an oath to support the constitution of the United States and the constitution of the state of Wyoming, to faithfully and impartially discharge their duties as such commissioners and to render a true account of their doings to the court by which they are appointed whenever required by law or the order of the court, and shall execute a bond running to the clerk of said court and his successors in office as obligees, to be filed with said clerk for the benefit of the parties interested, in an amount to be fixed by the court or presiding judge, and with sureties to be approved by the court or presiding judge, conditioned for the faithful discharge of their duties as such commissioners and the faithful accounting for and application of all moneys which shall come into their hands as such commissioners. A majority shall constitute a quorum and a concurrence of a majority in any matter within their duties shall be sufficient to its determination.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 18; C.S. 1920, § 1013; R.S. 1931, § 122-817; C.S. 1945, § 71-1417; W.S. 1957, § 41-371.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see Wyo. Const., art. 6, §§ 20, 21.

§ 41-9-118.
District commissioners; term.

The commissioners first appointed shall hold their office until the first Tuesday in the second succeeding July following the date of the order organizing such district and until their respective successors are qualified. All commissioners appointed after the first board, excepting those appointed to fill vacancies, shall hold their respective offices for the term of two (2) years and until their respective successors are qualified.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 19; C.S. 1920, § 1014; R.S. 1931, § 122-818; C.S. 1945, § 71-1418; W.S. 1957, § 41-372.

§ 41-9-119.
District commissioners; new appointments.

Appointments to fill expired terms in the office of drainage commissioner shall be made by the presiding judge of the district court of the county having jurisdiction of the drainage district at the courthouse therein on the first Tuesday of July in each succeeding year or as soon thereafter as possible.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 20; C.S. 1920, § 1015; R.S. 1931, § 122-819; C.S. 1945, § 71-1419; W.S. 1957, § 41-373.

§ 41-9-120.
District commissioners; vacancies.

Vacancies in the board may be filled by such judge at any time, the commissioners appointed to hold for the residue of the unexpired term. The removal of any commissioner from the county or counties in which lands of such district are situated shall render his office vacant.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 21; C.S. 1920, § 1016; R.S. 1931, § 122-820; C.S. 1945, § 71-1420; W.S. 1957, § 41-374.

§ 41-9-121.
District commissioners; financial records, minutes of meetings to be kept.

The commissioners shall keep an accurate record of all moneys collected on account of the work under their charge and of all payments made by them, and shall take vouchers for such payments and shall keep full, accurate and true minutes of all their proceedings.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 22; C.S. 1920, § 1017; R.S. 1931, § 122-821; C.S. 1945, § 71-1421; W.S. 1957, § 41-375.

§ 41-9-122.
District commissioners; filing of annual financial report.

On the first Tuesday of July each year they shall file in the office of the clerk of the court having jurisdiction in the matter an itemized statement of all their receipts and disbursements, and leave said report in such office for examination by parties interested at all times.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 23; C.S. 1920, § 1018; R.S. 1931, § 122-822; C.S. 1945, § 71-1422; W.S. 1957, § 41-376.

§ 41-9-123.
District commissioners; compensation and expenses.

They shall receive for their services such compensation as the court or presiding judge thereof may determine. They shall also receive their actual reasonable expenses.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 24; C.S. 1920, § 1019; R.S. 1931, § 122-823; C.S. 1945, § 71-1423; W.S. 1957, § 41-377.

§ 41-9-124.
District commissioners; under control and direction of court; failure to obey.

They shall at all times be under the control and direction of the court or presiding judge, and shall obey its or his directions; for failure so to do they shall forfeit their compensation and be dealt with summarily as for contempt.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 25; C.S. 1920, § 1020; R.S. 1931, § 122-824; C.S. 1945, § 71-1424; W.S. 1957, § 41-378.

§ 41-9-125.
Suit on bond of commissioners.

Suit may also be brought upon their bonds, in the name of the clerk of the court, and the amount recovered shall be applied to the construction of the work or to the party injured, as justice may require.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 26; C.S. 1920, § 1021; R.S. 1931, § 122-825; C.S. 1945, § 71-1425; W.S. 1957, § 41-379.

§ 41-9-126.
Organization of commission; examination of lands; contents of preliminary report.

Within ten (10) days after said commissioners shall be appointed and qualified they shall meet and organize by electing one (1) of their number secretary, and as soon as may be thereafter, they shall personally examine the lands in said district and make a preliminary report to the court, which report shall state:

Whether said proposed work is necessary, or would be of utility in carrying out the purposes of the petition;

Whether the proposed work would promote the public health;

Whether the proposed work would promote the public welfare;

Whether the total benefits from said proposed work will exceed the cost thereof together with the damages resulting therefrom; and in arriving at this they shall include all benefits and all damages resulting therefrom both within and without said district;

Said commissioners shall in said report fix as near as may be and report to the court the boundaries of said proposed drainage district. Said boundaries shall not be so changed from those in the petition described as to deprive the court of jurisdiction by reason of not having on the petition the required number of signers owning land within said changed boundaries.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 27; C.S. 1920, § 1022; R.S. 1931, § 122-826; C.S. 1945, § 71-1426; W.S. 1957, § 41-380.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-9-127.
Change of plan proposed in petition.

If said proposed work as in the petition described, is not best suited to carry out the purposes of the petition the commissioners shall consider and base their report upon the one (1) best suited to carry out those purposes and propose to the court the one (1) by them considered.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 28; C.S. 1920, § 1023; R.S. 1931, § 122-827; C.S. 1945, § 71-1427; W.S. 1957, § 41-381.

§ 41-9-128.
Hearings on report; notice generally.

Upon the filing of the preliminary report the court or the presiding judge thereof shall by order fix a time and place when and where the same shall be heard at some general or special term of said court, not less than thirty (30) days from the filing of said report. Notice of the time and place of hearing upon said preliminary report shall be given to all interested persons by publishing a brief notice of the filing of said report, including a brief statement of the substance of said report, in one (1) or more newspapers published in each county in which any land in said proposed drainage district shall be situated (or if no newspaper is published in said county, in one (1) or more newspapers in an adjoining county) once in each week for three (3) successive weeks prior to the day appointed for hearing thereon. Said notice shall describe all lands by said report included in said district, which were not included therein by the petition, and state that such lands are to be included in said district, and shall describe all lands excluded from said district which were by the petition included therein and shall state that such lands are to be excluded from said district.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 29; C.S. 1920, § 1024; R.S. 1931, § 122-828; C.S. 1945, § 71-1428; W.S. 1957, § 41-382.

§ 41-9-129.
Hearings on report; notice to owners of added lands.

When lands are added to the district the owners thereof shall be served with said notice as provided for serving of notice of hearing on the petition.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 32; C.S. 1920, § 1027; R.S. 1931, § 122-831; C.S. 1945, § 71-1431; W.S. 1957, § 41-383.

§ 41-9-130.
Hearings on report; adjournment.

Upon the day fixed for hearing upon said report, said court may adjourn said hearing for good cause or may proceed to hear, try and determine all issues arising upon said report.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 30; C.S. 1920, § 1025; R.S. 1931, § 122-829; C.S. 1945, § 71-1429; W.S. 1957, § 41-384.

§ 41-9-131.
Hearings on report; remonstrances.

Any interested party may appear and remonstrate against said report or any material part thereof. All remonstrances shall be in writing, be verified on oath, be filed at least five (5) days before the day fixed for hearing, and shall set forth the facts upon which they are based.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 31; C.S. 1920, § 1026; R.S. 1931, § 122-830; C.S. 1945, § 71-1430; W.S. 1957, § 41-385.

§ 41-9-132.
Hearings on report; trial; when petition for organization dismissed.

All issues arising upon said preliminary report shall be tried by the court without a jury. If the court shall find in favor of the remonstrance, or if said report be that the proposed work will not promote the public health, and will not promote the public welfare, or that the benefits from said proposed work will not exceed the damages and cost of construction, and no remonstrance against said report is filed, the petition shall be dismissed and the costs taxed against the petitioners, and judgment entered therefor, as in W.S.

41-9-231

hereinafter provided.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 33; C.S. 1920, § 1028; R.S. 1931, § 122-832; C.S. 1945, § 71-1432; W.S. 1957, § 41-386.

Cross references. —

See also §

41-9-231

.

§ 41-9-133.
Hearings on report; when report confirmed.

But if the preliminary report be that the benefits of said proposed work (or work by the commissioners proposed) will exceed the damages and the cost of construction and that the public health will be promoted thereby, or that the public welfare will be promoted thereby, and no remonstrance thereto is filed, or if on trial of the issues made on said report the court finds that the benefits will exceed the damages and cost of construction, and that the public health or the public welfare will be promoted by said proposed work, the court shall make and file such findings in writing and make an order confirming said report, or directing amendment of the report to conform to the findings of said court. And when so amended the court shall by order confirm the same, and direct said commissioners to proceed with said work with all convenient speed.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 34; C.S. 1920, § 1029; R.S. 1931, § 122-833; C.S. 1945, § 71-1433; W.S. 1957, § 41-387.

Cited

in

W.S. Dickey Clay Mfg. Co. v. Bullock, 28 Wyo. 265, 202 P. 1104,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1922).

§ 41-9-134.
Hearings on report; findings conclusive; appeal.

Such findings and order shall be final and conclusive unless appealed from to the supreme court within thirty (30) days after filing thereof.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 35; C.S. 1920, § 1030; R.S. 1931, § 122-834; C.S. 1945, § 71-1434; W.S. 1957, § 41-388.

§ 41-9-135.
Creation of corporate entity upon confirmation of report.

Upon entering of such order of confirmation of said preliminary report of record, such drainage district shall be, and is thereby declared to be organized as a drainage district, by the name mentioned in said petition, or such other name as the court shall fix, with the boundaries fixed by the order confirming the report of said commissioners, to be a body corporate by said name fixed in said order, with the right to sue and be sued, to adopt and use a seal, and to have perpetual succession.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 36; C.S. 1920, § 1031; R.S. 1931, § 122-835; C.S. 1945, § 71-1435; W.S. 1957, § 41-389.

Drainage district may sue. —

There is no reason to hold that a drainage district may not sue when it represents the state. Alamo Drainage Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 60 Wyo. 177, 148 P.2d 229,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1944).

Drainage district agent of bondholders. —

A drainage district is, in a sense, an agent of its bondholders in causing assessments to be made and in protecting their interests. Board of County Comm'rs v. Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 56 Wyo. 260, 108 P.2d 590,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1940).

Necessary parties. —

Bondholders need not be brought in as necessary parties to an action where their interests do not conflict with those of drainage district and where they are virtually represented by the district, so long as the latter acts in good faith. Board of County Comm'rs v. Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 56 Wyo. 260, 108 P.2d 590,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1940).

Cited

in

W.S. Dickey Clay Mfg. Co. v. Bullock, 28 Wyo. 265, 202 P. 1104,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1922).

§ 41-9-136.
Corporate authorities.

The commissioners appointed as aforesaid and their successors in office shall, from the entry of such order of confirmation, constitute the corporate authority of said drainage district, and shall exercise the functions conferred on them by law, and do all things and perform all acts necessary to the construction and preservation of the proposed work.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 37; C.S. 1920, § 1032; R.S. 1931, § 122-836; C.S. 1945, § 71-1436; W.S. 1957, § 41-390.

Cross references. —

As to district commissioners generally, see §

41-9-116

et seq.

Drainage district may sue. —

Drainage district, being a public or quasi-public corporation, is owner of funds collected by taxation for its benefit and may sue to recover them. Board of Comm'rs v. Byron Drainage Dist., 52 Wyo. 417, 75 P.2d 759,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1938).

Necessary parties. —

Bondholders need not be brought in as necessary parties to action where their interests do not conflict with those of drainage district and where they are virtually represented by the district, so long as the latter acts in good faith. Board of County Comm'rs v. Bench Canal Drainage Dist., 56 Wyo. 260, 108 P.2d 590,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1940).

Cited

in

W.S. Dickey Clay Mfg. Co. v. Bullock, 28 Wyo. 265, 202 P. 1104,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1922).

§ 41-9-137.
All proceedings deemed necessary.

All proceedings herein required, prior to the entry of such order of confirmation of record, shall be deemed to be and are hereby declared to be necessary to the formation of said body corporate.

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 95, § 38; C.S. 1920, § 1033; R.S. 1931, § 122-837; C.S. 1945, § 71-1437; W.S. 1957, § 41-391.